Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201621-223
Organization of corporation.

(MBCA 2.05) (a) After incorporation:

(1) If initial directors
are named in the articles of incorporation, the initial directors shall hold
an organizational meeting, at the call of a majority of the directors, to
complete the organization of the corporation by appointing officers, adopting
bylaws, and carrying on any other business brought before the meeting; or

(2) If initial directors
are not named in the articles, the incorporator or incorporators shall hold
an organizational meeting at the call of a majority of the incorporators:

(i) To elect directors and
complete the organization of the corporation; or

(ii) To elect a board of directors
who shall complete the organization of the corporation.

(b) Action required or permitted
by the Nebraska Model Business Corporation Act to be taken by incorporators
at an organizational meeting may be taken without a meeting if the action
taken is evidenced by one or more written consents describing the action taken
and signed by each incorporator.

(c) An organizational meeting may be held in or out
of this state.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 23.